Utah statutes.
78B-6-814.   Exclusion of tenant without judicial process prohibited --
Abandoned premises excepted.
It is unlawful for an owner to willfully exclude a tenant from the tenant's
premises in any manner except by judicial process, provided, an owner or his
agent shall not be prevented from removing the contents of the leased premises
under Subsection 78B-6-816(2) and retaking the premises and attempting to rent
them at a fair rental value when the tenant has abandoned the premises.
